Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5210.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 47331. (1) Upon On the payment of the fee provided for in section 47330, the department shall have prepared prepare and shall issue to a person entitled to the same, a printed or written license signed by the department setting forth the date of issuing the license, to whom the license was issued, the date on which it will expire, the license expires, the name or number of the license, and the number of and kind of boat, tug, or launch, including vessel for which the license was issued, and the number of and kind of net or nets for which the license was issued. A licensee may list single or multiple vessels on each license, list the same vessel or vessels on each license, and may add or subtract vessels at any time on a license on written notification to the department. The department shall also issue, with the license, a suitable tag bearing the license number and the year for which the license was issued which that must be attached to the boat a vessel to facilitate identification. The department, upon on application and the payment of a fee of $1.00, $25.00, may do 1 or more of the following: (a) Permit the transfer of a license to a larger or a smaller boat or to any boat, tug, or launch vessel during a period of time that the licensed boat, tug, or launch vessel is disabled and undergoing repairs. (b) In case of the sale If the owner sells or the transfer of transfers the title of any licensed boat, vessel, transfer the license to the new owner or owners. However, if the sale or transfer is to a nonresident as determined by the preceding sections, under section 47330, then the difference between the fee for a resident license and a nonresident license shall must also be paid. (c) In case of the loss of a If a vessel by fire, collision, or otherwise, for which a license has been issued is lost by fire, collision, or otherwise, transfer the license to any similar boat vessel to which the licensee may acquire title. (2) Whenever If a license is transferred to a larger boat, vessel, the difference between the fee paid for the license and the fee required by this part for that boat shall vessel must also be paid. A refund shall is not be made when if a license is transferred to a smaller boat. vessel. However, any boat vessel to which a license has been transferred as provided in this section shall must be used in the taking, catching, or killing of fish or in the setting or pulling of nets, set hook lines, or other commercial fishing devices, only within a radius of 50 miles of the port designated in the license as originally issued. , and not more than 1 license shall be issued for any 1 boat in any 1 calendar year. The owner of any licensed boat vessel acquired from the estate of a deceased licensee or as a result of bankruptcy proceedings may, in addition to having the license transferred in his or her the owner's name, have a port of his or her the owner's choice designated in the license.